District of Columbia statutes.
7-854

Rules.

The Mayor, pursuant to subchapter I of Chapter 5 of Title 2 shall issue rules to implement the provisions of this subchapter.

Apr. 4, 2001, D.C. Law 13-276, § 5, 48 DCR 1865
Delegation of Authority Pursuant to DC Law 13-276, the “Newborn Hearing Screening Act of 2000”, see Mayor’s Order 2002-12, February 1, 2002 ( 49 DCR 929).